Maryland, session 2025, SB0444.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Public Safety
5–114.
(b) The Secretary shall revoke a dealer’s license if:
(1) it is discovered that false information has been supplied or false
statements have been made in an application required by this subtitle; or
(2) the licensee:
(i) is convicted of a disqualifying crime;
(ii) is convicted of a violation classified as a common law crime and
receives a term of imprisonment of more than 2 years;
(iii) is a fugitive from justice;
(iv) is a habitual drunkard;
(v) is addicted to a controlled dangerous substance or is a habitual
user;
(vi) has spent more than 30 consecutive days in a medical institution
for treatment of a mental disorder, unless the licensee produces a physician’s certificate,
issued after the last institutionalization and certifying that the licensee is capable of
possessing a regulated firearm without undue danger to the licensee or to another;
(vii) has knowingly or willfully manufactured, offered to sell, or sold
a handgun not on the handgun roster in violation of § 5–406 of this title;
(viii) has knowingly or willfully participated in a straw purchase of a
regulated firearm;
(ix) is convicted of a crime under Subtitle 7 of this title; [or]
(x) is found in violation of a third or subsequent offense under §
5–145.1 of this subtitle; OR
(XI) VIOLATES SUBTITLE 9 OF THIS TITLE.

SENATE BILL 444 3
SUBTITLE 9. GUN BUYBACK PROGRAMS.
5–901.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “FIREARM” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 5–101 OF THIS TITLE.
(C) “GUN BUYBACK PROGRAM” MEANS A PROGRAM THAT IS OPERATED BY
A FEDERAL FIREARMS LICENSEE OR A LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY THAT:
(1) ALLOWS FIREARM OWNERS TO VOLUNTARILY SURRENDER
FIREARMS;
(2) IS OPERATED, EITHER EXPLICITLY OR IMPLIEDLY, FOR THE
PURPOSE OF REDUCING THE NUMBER OF FIREARMS IN A COMMUNITY; AND
(3) ADVERTISES THAT FIREARMS THAT ARE SURRENDERED TO THE
PROGRAM WILL BE DESTROYED OR MADE PERMANENTLY INOPERABLE. A PUBLIC OR
PRIVATE PERSON OR ENTITY THAT ALLOWS FIREARM OWNERS TO VOLUNTARILY
TRADE IN THEIR FIREARMS FOR COMPENSATION.
(D) “SECRETARY” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 5–101 OF THIS TITLE.
5–902.
(A) THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO A FIREARM IF A LAW ENFORCEMENT
AGENCY DETERMINES THAT THE FIREARM IS STOLEN OR IS EVIDENCE OF A CRIME.
(A) (B) (1) (I) SUBJECT TO SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH, A PERSON OR AN ENTITY FEDERAL FIREARMS LICENSEE OR LAW
ENFORCEMENT AGENCY OPERATING A GUN BUYBACK PROGRAM SHALL DESTROY A
EACH FIREARM, INCLUDING EVERY COMPONENT AND PART ATTACHED TO THE
FIREARM, THAT IS TRADED IN SURRENDERED TO THE FEDERAL FIREARMS LICENSEE
OR LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY AT A GUN BUYBACK PROGRAM.
(II) THE DESTRUCTION REQUIRED UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I)
OF THIS PARAGRAPH SHALL MAKE THE FIREARM AND EVERY COMPONENT AND PART
ATTACHED TO THE FIREARM PERMANENTLY INOPERABLE AND UNREPAIRABLE.
(2) A PERSON OR AN ENTITY FEDERAL FIREARMS LICENSEE OR LAW
ENFORCEMENT AGENCY MAY CONTRACT WITH A LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY, AN

SENATE BILL 444
ORGANIZATION, OR A BUSINESS TO SATISFY THE REQUIREMENT UNDER PARAGRAPH
(1) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
(B) (C) A PERSON OR AN ENTITY FEDERAL FIREARMS LICENSEE OR LAW
ENFORCEMENT AGENCY THAT VIOLATES THIS SECTION IS SUBJECT TO A FINE NOT
EXCEEDING $10,000 PER VIOLATION.
(C) (D) IF A PERSON VIOLATES THIS SECTION AND THE PERSON HOLDS A
DEALER’S LICENSE UNDER § 5–106 OF THIS TITLE:
(1) THE PERSON SHALL BE SUBJECT TO THE PENALTY PROVIDED IN
SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION; AND
(2) THE SECRETARY SHALL REVOKE THE PERSON’S DEALER’S
LICENSE IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 5–114 OF THIS TITLE.
5–903.
(A) A PERSON MAY NOT OPERATE A GUN BUYBACK PROGRAM, EXCEPT IN
ACCORDANCE WITH § 5–902 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(B) A PERSON WHO VIOLATES THIS SECTION IS GUILTY OF A MISDEMEANOR
AND ON CONVICTION IS SUBJECT TO A FINE NOT EXCEEDING $10,000.
5–904.
A LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY THAT RECEIVES A FIREARM AS PART OF A GUN
BUYBACK PROGRAM UNDER THIS SUBTITLE SHALL MAKE REASONABLE EFFORTS TO
DETERMINE WHETHER THE FIREARM IS A CRIME FIREARM OR HAS BEEN REPORTED
AS LOST OR STOLEN BEFORE THE FIREARM OR ITS COMPONENT PARTS MAY BE
DESTROYED AS REQUIRED UNDER § 5–902 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
5–905.
NOTHING IN THIS SUBTITLE MAY BE INTERPRETED AS AN EXCEPTION TO ANY
OTHER REQUIREMENT OR RESTRICTION UNDER STATE OR FEDERAL LAW RELATING
TO THE PURCHASE, RENTAL, LOAN, OR TRANSFER OF A FIREARM.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.